Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 1. In General

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2003, ch. 88, § 3, provides: “Except as otherwise specified, the legislature hereby transfers all functions, programs and authority of the Wyoming emergency management agency to the governor's office. All personnel of the Wyoming emergency management agency except the coordinator shall be transferred to the governor's office. The adjutant general's position shall not be affected by this section. Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the property interests of current permanent employees within the emergency management agency except for the coordinator who shall be appointed by and subject to removal by the governor.”

Laws 2003, ch. 88, § 4, provides: “This act is intended simply to transfer the control of the Wyoming emergency management agency from the adjutant general to the governor's office. The Wyoming legislature intends to make no substantive change to prior law including, but not limited to revenue, either increases or decreases, powers, duties, authorities, obligations, definitions, administration, confidentiality, imposition, tax rates, exemptions, licenses, permits, compliance, collection procedures, enforcement, remedies, statutes of limitation or distribution of taxes. This act is not intended to affect the validity of any rule or regulation promulgated prior to the effective date of this act [March 3, 2003].”

Laws 2003, ch. 88, § 5, provides: “On or before July 1, 2005, the homeland security director appointed under section 1 of this act shall report to the joint transportation and highways interim committee on the efficacy of the transfer of the Wyoming emergency management agency pursuant to this act.”

Laws 2003, ch. 88, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2003.

§ 19-13-101.
Citation.

This act may be cited as the “Wyoming Homeland Security Act”.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 104, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 19-99; Laws 1969, ch. 152, § 1; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. §

19-5-101

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “Wyoming Homeland Security Act” for “Wyoming Emergency Management Act.”

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act,” referred to in this section, means §§

19-13-101

through

19-13-414

.

§ 19-13-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“County or county-city program” means a program created in accordance with the provisions of this act by the state or a political subdivision to perform local homeland security functions;

“Homeland security” means the preparation for and the carrying out of all emergency functions essential to the recovery and restoration of the economy by supply and resupply of resources to meet urgent survival and military needs, other than functions for which military forces are primarily responsible, necessary to deal with disasters caused by enemy attack, sabotage, terrorism, civil disorder or other hostile action, or by fire, flood, earthquake, other natural causes and other technological, industrial, civil and political events. These functions include without limitation the coordination of fire-fighting services, police services, medical and health services, rescue, engineering, attack warning services, communications, radiological events, evacuation of persons from stricken areas, emergency welfare services (civilian war aid), emergency transportation, existing or properly assigned functions of plant protection, temporary restoration of public utility services, mitigation activities in areas threatened by natural or technological hazards, and other functions related to civilian protection, together with all other activities necessary or incidental to the preparation for any carrying out of the foregoing functions;

“Emergency support task force” means a homeland security organization created in accordance with the provisions of this act by the state or a political subdivision to supplement homeland security programs in a stricken area;

“Political subdivision” means an incorporated community or a county in Wyoming;

“Director” means the director, office of homeland security appointed pursuant to W.S.

19-13-104

;

“Public safety agencies” means any federal, state or political subdivision entity that provides emergency and public safety services, including state agencies employing peace officers enumerated in W.S. 6-1-104(a)(vi)(C) through (F) and approved for participation by the commission, fire management services, correctional services, homeland security, emergency and disaster relief services and if desired by county, municipal and federal law enforcement agencies;

“Ammunition” means a cartridge, shell or other device containing explosive or incendiary material designed and intended for use in a firearm;

“Firearm” means any weapon which will or is designed to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 104, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 19-100; Laws 1969, ch. 152, § 2; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; 1986, ch. 68, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-102

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2003, ch. 88, § 1; 2005, ch. 169, § 1; 2008, ch. 61, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted provisions in (a)(i), (a)(ii), (a)(iii), (a)(v) and (a)(vi) to reflect the agency name “emergency management” has been changed to “homeland security,” and made a conforming provision change in (a)(v).

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added (a)(vii) and (a)(viii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act,” referred to in this section, means §§

19-13-101

through

19-13-414

.

§ 19-13-103.
Legislative determination; coordination with federal government and other states.

Because of the possibility of the occurrence of disasters of unprecedented size and destructiveness resulting from enemy attack, sabotage, terrorism, civil disorder or other hostile action, or from fire, flood, earthquake, other natural causes and other technological disasters, and to insure that preparations of Wyoming will be adequate to deal with such disasters, and generally to provide for the common defense and to protect the public peace, health and safety, and to preserve the lives and property of the people of Wyoming, it is hereby found and declared to be necessary:

To create a Wyoming office of homeland security within the governor’s office, and to authorize the creation of local homeland security programs in the political subdivisions of the state;

To confer upon the governor and upon the executive heads or governing bodies of the political subdivisions of the state the emergency powers provided herein, and to provide for state assistance in the organization and maintenance of the homeland security programs of such political subdivisions;

To provide for the assignment of specific responsibilities to all state agencies to be performed during a disaster or national emergency and for the coordination and direction of the emergency actions of such agencies; and

To provide for the rendering of mutual aid among the political subdivisions of the state and with other states with respect to the carrying out of homeland security functions.

It is further declared to be the purpose of this act and the policy of Wyoming that all homeland security functions of this state be coordinated to the maximum extent with the comparable functions of its political subdivisions, of the federal government including its various departments and agencies, of other states and localities, and of private agencies of every type, to the end that the most effective preparation and use may be made of the manpower, resources and facilities for dealing with any disaster that may occur.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 104, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 19-101; Laws 1969, ch. 152, § 3; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; 1979, ch. 78, § 1; 1986, ch. 68, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-103

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2003, ch. 88, § 1; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted provisions throughout to reflect the agency name “emergency management” has been changed to “homeland security.”

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act,” referred to in this section, means §§

19-13-101

through

19-13-414

.

§ 19-13-104.
Powers of governor generally; director, office of homeland security.

The governor has general direction and control of the office of homeland security, and is responsible for the carrying out of the provisions of this act, and in the event of disaster beyond local control, may assume direct operational control over all or any part of the homeland security functions within Wyoming. The governor may delegate such powers to the director established under subsection (d) of this section, or through the director to the deputy director to carry out this act.

In performing his duties under this act, the governor may cooperate with the federal government, with other states and with private agencies in all matters pertaining to the disaster relief and homeland security of this state and of the nation.

In performing his duties under this act, the governor may:

Make, amend and rescind the necessary orders, rules and regulations to carry out this act within the limits of the authority conferred upon him herein, with due consideration of the plans of the federal government. The governor may assign to a state agency any activity concerned with the mitigation of the effects of a disaster or national emergency of a nature related to the existing powers and duties of the agency, including interstate activities, and the agency shall undertake and carry out the activity on behalf of the state;

Prepare a comprehensive homeland security plan and program for this state to be integrated into and coordinated with the homeland security plans of the federal government and of other states to the fullest possible extent, and coordinate the preparation of plans and programs for homeland security by the political subdivisions of this state to be integrated into and coordinated with the homeland security plan and program of this state to the fullest possible extent;

In accordance with the homeland security plan and program for this state, procure supplies and equipment, institute training programs and public information programs and take all other preparatory steps including the partial or full mobilization of homeland security organizations in advance of actual disaster, to insure the furnishing of adequately trained and equipped forces of homeland security personnel in time of need;

Make such studies and surveys of the industries, resources and facilities in this state as necessary to ascertain the capabilities of the state and its political subdivisions for meeting homeland security requirements, and to plan for the most efficient emergency use therefor;

On behalf of this state, enter into interstate mutual aid and international compacts with other states and foreign countries or subdivisions thereof and coordinate mutual-aid plans between political subdivisions of this state;

Delegate any administrative authority vested in him under this act, provide for the subdelegation of any such authority and appoint, in cooperation with local authorities, political subdivision coordinators.

The position of the director, office of homeland security is created in the governor’s office and shall be appointed by the governor. He shall be responsible to the governor and may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The director shall:

Supervise the Wyoming office of homeland security;

Provide technical assistance to public safety agencies in the area of homeland security;

Coordinate with the federal department of homeland security;

Perform other duties assigned by the governor for homeland security;

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 17, § 2.

With the exception of regulating governmental entities who engage in the activities described in this section or who operate an indoor or outdoor shooting range, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to confer upon the governor, the director, the executive heads or governing bodies of the political subdivisions of the state, sheriffs, chiefs of police or any employee or agent of the state or any governmental unit within the state the power to:

Confiscate a firearm from a person, unless:

The person is in unlawful possession of the firearm as provided in title 6 of the Wyoming statutes;

The person is unlawfully carrying the firearm as provided in title 6 of the Wyoming statutes; or

The firearm is confiscated by a peace officer who is acting in the lawful discharge of his duties and under the reasonable belief that the confiscation is necessary for the protection of the peace officer, the person carrying the firearm or a third party. The peace officer shall return the firearm to the person before discharging the person unless the officer arrests that person for engaging in criminal activity or seizes the firearm as evidence pursuant to an investigation for the commission of a crime.

Impose additional restrictions as to the lawful possession, permitting, transfer, sale, carrying, storage, display or use of:

Firearms or other personal weapons;

Ammunition; or

Components of firearms, personal weapons or ammunition.

Close or limit the operating hours of any person or entity engaged in the lawful selling or servicing of any firearm, ammunition or other personal weapon, or any component thereof, unless the closing or limitation of operating hours applies equally to all forms of commerce within the jurisdiction of the state, political subdivision or governmental entity;

Close or limit the operating hours of any indoor or outdoor shooting range;

Place restrictions or quantity limitations on any entity regarding the lawful sale or servicing of any firearm, ammunition or personal weapon, or any component thereof;

Suspend or revoke a permit to carry a concealed weapon issued pursuant to W.S.

6-8-104

, unless the suspension or revocation is authorized and completed pursuant to W.S.

6-8-104

.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 104, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 19-102; Laws 1969, ch. 152, § 4; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; 1986, ch. 68, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-104

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2003, ch. 88, § 1; 2005, ch. 169, § 1; 2008, ch. 61, § 1; 2012, ch. 30, § 3; 2017 ch. 17, § 2, effective February 16, 2017; 2021 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment

substituted provisions throughout to reflect the agency name “emergency management” has been changed to “homeland security.”

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added (e).

The 2012 amendment,

added (d)(v), and made related changes.

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (e), added "With the exception of regulating governmental entities who engage in the activities described in this section or who operate an indoor or outdoor shooting range," at the beginning and made a related change; added "permitting," in (e)(ii); added "or other personal weapons" in (e)(ii)(A); added ", personal weapons" in (e)(ii)(C); and added (e)(iii) through (e)(vi).

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act,” referred to in this section, means §§

19-13-101

through

19-13-414

.

§ 19-13-105.
Homeland security program.

The office of homeland security within the governor’s office is created. The governor shall appoint a deputy director of the office of homeland security. The director may appoint such assistants as may be necessary. The director and his assistants shall be compensated in an amount to be determined and fixed by the Wyoming human resources division. The deputy director shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and may be removed as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

The director may employ technical, clerical, stenographic and other personnel and make such expenditures within the appropriations or from other funds made available to him for purposes of homeland security as necessary to carry out this act. He shall be provided with necessary and appropriate office space, furniture, equipment, stationery and printing in the same manner as for personnel of other state agencies.

The director is the administrative head of the Wyoming office of homeland security. In addition to the duties described in W.S. 19-13-104(d) the director:

Shall be responsible to the governor for the implementation of the state program for homeland security for Wyoming;

Shall assist the local authorities and organizations in the planning and development of local homeland security plans and programs;

Shall coordinate the activities of all organizations for homeland security within the state, including all state departments;

Shall maintain liaison with and cooperate with homeland security agencies and programs of other states and of the federal government;

Shall have additional authority, duties and responsibilities authorized by this act as may be prescribed by the governor or the director;

May prescribe reasonable qualifications for officers and employees of local programs and reasonable regulations for the administration of local programs; and

Shall assist and coordinate with local, state, tribal and federal law enforcement agencies to employ the integrated public alert and warning system or successor system to notify residents of imminent threat by natural disaster or manmade event or to aid in the safe recovery of missing or endangered persons, which adheres to United States department of justice criteria.

The deputy director shall perform duties as assigned by the director and in the absence of the director he is the administrative head of the Wyoming office of homeland security.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 104, § 4; 1957, ch. 157, § 40; W.S. 1957, § 19-103; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 31; 1965, ch. 115, § 32; 1969, ch. 152, § 5; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; 1979, ch. 78, § 1; 1986, ch. 68, § 1; 1996, ch. 5, § 1; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-105

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2003, ch. 88, § 1; 2005, ch. 169, § 1; 2020 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendment

substituted provisions throughout to reflect the agency name “emergency management” has been changed to “homeland security,” and to reflect the change from a coordinator of emergency management to a deputy director of the office of homeland security; and added (d).

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (c)(vii) and made related changes.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act,” referred to in this section, means §§

19-13-101

through

19-13-414

.

§ 19-13-106.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1951, ch. 104, § 5, created the emergency management advisory board.

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

§ 19-13-107.
Emergency support task forces.

The governor or his duly authorized representative and the governing bodies of political subdivisions may create and establish such number of emergency support task forces as necessary to reinforce homeland security programs in stricken areas with due consideration of the plans of the federal government and of other states. The governor or governing body of the political subdivision shall appoint for each unit a coordinator who has primary responsibility for the organization, administration and operation of the unit. Emergency support task forces shall be activated upon orders of the governor or governing body of the political subdivisions and shall perform their functions in any part of the state, or upon conditions specified in this section, in other states. The governor may remove any emergency support task force member he appoints as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

Personnel of emergency support task forces while on duty, whether within or without the state, under orders of the governor shall be paid as follows:

If they are employees of the state or a political subdivision of the state, they shall continue to be paid by their employers and receive the same pay and have the same powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities, including their rights under the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act incident to employment;

Personnel of emergency support task forces who are not employees of the state or a political subdivision thereof, while on duty, whether within or without the state, shall be paid the current rate established by the United States department of labor in its area wage determination scale for skilled, semiskilled and unskilled workers. The wage determination shall be based upon that normally established and obtained through the office of the district engineer, corps of engineers, Omaha, Nebraska, as determined in the particular area of the state wherein the work is being or to be performed. Acceptance by the proper hiring authority of any volunteer and his services will constitute qualification of his skill and craft as set out in the wage determination scale, and the volunteer is entitled to the same rights and immunities as are provided by law for the employees of the state. In the event of injury, disability or death, such personnel shall be entitled to compensation at the same rates as provided by the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act for like injuries, disabilities or death.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 154, § 1; 1969, ch. 152, §§ 8, 9; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-107

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “homeland security” for “emergency management” in (a).

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

§ 19-13-108.
Local programs; authorized; local homeland security plan; coordinators; appointment and removal.

Each political subdivision of this state shall establish a local homeland security program in accordance with the state homeland security plan and program. Each political subdivision through the homeland security program will cause to be prepared a local homeland security plan which will include actions essential to the recovery and restoration of the economy by supply and resupply of resources to meet urgent survival and military needs and to provide for the ongoing management of resources available to meet continuing survival and recovery needs. Each local homeland security program shall have a coordinator appointed by the governor upon the recommendation of the local jurisdiction. The coordinator has direct responsibility for the organization, administration and operation of the local homeland security program subject to the direction and control of the local jurisdiction under the general direction of the governor. The governor may remove any coordinator as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 104, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 19-107; Laws 1969, ch. 152, § 10; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-108

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted provisions throughout to reflect the agency name “emergency management” has been changed to “homeland security.”

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

§ 19-13-109.
Local programs; reciprocal and mutual aid.

The local coordinators in collaboration with other public and private agencies within this state will develop or cause to be developed mutual aid arrangements for reciprocal homeland security aid and assistance in case of disaster of extreme nature which affects two (2) or more political subdivisions or is too great to be dealt with unassisted. The arrangements shall be consistent with the state homeland security plan and program, and in time of emergency each local homeland security program shall render assistance in accordance with the provisions of the mutual aid arrangements.

The coordinator of each local homeland security program with the approval of the governor, may enter into mutual aid arrangements with homeland security agencies or organizations in other states for reciprocal emergency aid and assistance in case of disaster too great to be dealt with unassisted.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 104, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 19-108; Laws 1969, ch. 152, § 11; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-109

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted provisions throughout to reflect the agency name “emergency management” has been changed to “homeland security.”

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

§ 19-13-110.
Funds, supplies and equipment; generally.

Each political subdivision may make appropriations for the payment of expenses of its local homeland security programs.

Whenever the federal government or any agency or officer thereof or any person, firm or corporation shall offer to the state or to any political subdivision thereof services, equipment, supplies, materials or funds by way of gift, grant or loan for purposes of disaster relief or homeland security, the state acting through the governor, or the political subdivision acting with the consent of the governor and through its executive officer or governing body, may accept the offer. Upon acceptance the governor of the state or executive officer or governing body of the political subdivision may authorize any officer of the state or of the political subdivision to receive the services, equipment, supplies, materials or funds on behalf of the state or the political subdivisions. This authority will include participation in the federal surplus property program. All funds received from the federal government or any agency thereof shall be deposited in an appropriate separate account together with funds appropriated by a political subdivision, and expenditures from the account shall be made only upon authority of the local governing body and only for the purposes specified in this act [§§

19-13-101

through

19-13-116

].

The board of county commissioners in any county may levy a tax for the support and maintenance of county, city, town, county-city or county-town homeland security programs.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 104, § 11; 1957, ch. 211, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 19-109; Laws 1969, ch. 152, § 12; 1977, ch. 45, § 2; ch. 138, § 1; 1994, ch. 19, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-110

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted provisions throughout to reflect the agency name “emergency management” has been changed to “homeland security.”

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

§ 19-13-111.
Funds, supplies and equipment; authority to make use of existing facilities.

In carrying out the provisions of this act [§§

19-13-101

through

19-13-116

], the governor and the executive officers or governing bodies of the political subdivisions of the state are directed to utilize the services, equipment, supplies and facilities of existing departments, offices and agencies of the state and of the political subdivisions thereof to the maximum extent practicable, and the officers and personnel of all departments, offices and agencies are directed to cooperate with and extend such services and facilities to the governor, the director and the homeland security programs throughout the state upon request.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 104, § 12; 1957, ch. 211, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 19-110; Laws 1969, ch. 152, § 13; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-111

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2003, ch. 88, § 1; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “director” for “coordinator” and “homeland security” for “emergency management.”

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

§ 19-13-112.
Programs barred from political activity.

No homeland security program established under the authority of this act [§§

19-13-101

through

19-13-116

] shall participate in any form of political activity or be employed directly or indirectly for political purposes.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 104, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 19-111; Laws 1969, ch. 152, § 14; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-112

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “homeland security” for “emergency management.”

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

§ 19-13-113.
State and political subdivisions exempt from liability; exceptions; license to practice not required; homeland security worker defined; recognized educational programs; real estate owners exempt from liability; criminal history record information.

All activities relating to homeland security are governmental functions. The state, any political subdivision, state agencies, and, except in cases of willful misconduct, gross negligence or bad faith, any homeland security worker complying with or reasonably attempting to comply with W.S.

19-13-101

through

19-13-116

, any order, rule or regulation promulgated thereunder, or pursuant to any ordinance relating to blackout or other precautionary measures enacted by any political subdivision of the state, or in training for such activity, is not liable for the death of or injury to persons or for damage to property as a result of the activity or training. This section shall not affect the right of any person to receive benefits to which he would otherwise be entitled under W.S.

19-13-101

through

19-13-116

, under the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act, or under any pension law, nor affect the right of any person to receive benefits or compensation under any act of congress.

Any requirement for a license to practice any professional, mechanical or other skill does not apply to any authorized homeland security worker who, in the course of performing homeland security duties, practices a professional, teaching, training, mechanical or other skill during a homeland security emergency, in training for an emergency or during homeland security exercises.

As used in this section “homeland security worker” includes any full or part-time paid, volunteer or auxiliary employee of any state, territories or possessions of the United States, the District of Columbia, any neighboring country, any political subdivision thereof, or any agency or program performing homeland security services at any place in this state subject to the order or control of or pursuant to a request of the state government or any political subdivision thereof and includes instructors and students in recognized educational programs where homeland security services are taught. A recognized educational program includes programs in educational institutions duly existing under the laws of this state and such other educational programs as are established by the office of homeland security or otherwise under this act.

Any person owning or controlling real estate or other premises who voluntarily and without compensation grants a license or privilege or otherwise permits the designation or use of the whole or any part of the real estate or premises for the purposes of sheltering persons during an actual, impending, mock or practice exercise, together with his successors in interest, is not civilly liable for negligently causing the death of or injury to any person on or about the real estate or premises nor for loss of or damage to the property of any person.

The director may, as a condition for a position as a homeland security worker, require prospective homeland security workers to submit to fingerprinting in order to obtain state and national criminal history record information.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 104, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 19-112; Laws 1961, ch. 45, § 1; 1969, ch. 152, § 15; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-113

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2005, ch. 169, § 1; 2006, ch. 62, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted provisions throughout to reflect the agency name “emergency management” has been changed to “homeland security.”

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

The 2006 amendment

added (e).

Laws 2006, ch. 62, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2006.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act,” referred to in this section, means §§

19-13-101

through

19-13-414

.

Wyoming Workers’ Compensation Act. —

See

27-14-101

et seq.

Concept of “gross negligence” limited. —

“Gross negligence” is no longer pertinent under Wyoming law except in a few isolated circumstances, such as this section. Danculovich v. Brown, 593 P.2d 187,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 397

(Wyo. 1979).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” 7 Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

§ 19-13-114.
Persons advocating change by force or violence in form of government prohibited from employment or association; oath.

No person shall be employed or associated in any capacity in any homeland security program established under this act [§§

19-13-101

through

19-13-116

]:

Who advocates or has advocated a change by force or violence in the constitutional form of the government of the United States or of this state, or the overthrow of any government in the United States by force or violence; or

Who has been convicted of or is under indictment or information charging any subversive act against the United States.

Each person appointed to serve in a homeland security program, before entering upon his duties, shall take an oath in writing before a person authorized to administer oaths in this state, substantially as follows:

“I
. . . . .
do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support and defend the constitution of the United States and the constitution of the state of Wyoming against all enemies, foreign and domestic; that I will bear true faith and allegiance to the same; that I take this obligation freely without any mental reservation or purpose of evasion; and that I will well and faithfully discharge the duties on which I am about to enter.”

“And I do further swear (or affirm) that I do not advocate, nor am I a member or an affiliate of any organization, group or combination of persons that advocates the overthrow of the government of the United States or of this state by force or violence; and that during such time as I am a member of the (name of homeland security program) I will not advocate nor become a member of any political party or organization that advocates the overthrow of the government of the United States or of this state by force or violence.”

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 104, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 19-113; Laws 1969, ch. 152, § 16; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-114

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to persons authorized to take oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

The 2005 amendment

substituted provisions throughout to reflect the agency name “emergency management” has been changed to “homeland security.”

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

§ 19-13-115.
Admission of professional personnel of other states in emergency.

In the event disaster conditions in Wyoming require visitation to this state by homeland security personnel from other states, including physicians, dentists, veterinarians, nurses or other professional personnel, reciprocity by way of allowing those professional persons to practice their professional talents without the normal admissions to practice in this state during the period of the emergency, is allowed.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 104, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 19-114; Laws 1969, ch. 152, § 17; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-115

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “homeland security” for “emergency management.”

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

§ 19-13-116.
Enforcement of orders, rules and regulations.

Every homeland security program established pursuant to this act [§§

19-13-101

through

19-13-116

] and the officers thereof shall execute and enforce orders, rules and regulations made by the governor under authority of this act. Each organization shall have available for inspection at its office all orders, rules and regulations made by the governor or under his authority.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 104, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 19-115; 1969, ch. 152, § 18; Laws 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-116

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted provisions throughout to reflect the agency name “emergency management” has been changed to “homeland security.”

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

Severability. —

Section 17, ch. 104, Laws 1951, reads: “If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or application of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.”